Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.060

Powers of commissions.

The commission may act as the research and fact-finding agency of the municipality. To that end it may make such surveys, analyses, researches and reports as are generally authorized or requested by its council or board, or by the state with the approval of its council or board. The commission, upon such request or authority may also:

(1) Make inquiries, investigations, and surveys concerning the resources of the county, including but not limited to the potential for solar energy development and alternative means to encourage and protect access to direct sunlight for solar energy systems;

(2) Assemble and analyze the data thus obtained and formulate plans for the conservation of such resources and the systematic utilization and development thereof;

(3) Make recommendations from time to time as to the best methods of such conservation, utilization, and development;

(4) Cooperate with other commissions and with other public agencies of the municipality, state and United States in such planning, conservation, and development; and

(5) In particular cooperate with and aid the state within its territorial limits in the preparation of the state master plan provided for in RCW 43.21A.350 and in advance planning of public works programs.

In carrying out its powers and duties, the commission should demonstrate how land use planning is integrated with transportation planning.

[ 2002 c 189 s 1; 1988 c 127 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 170 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.63.060. Prior: 1935 c 44 s 10; RRS s 9322-10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 170: See note following RCW 64.04.140.